Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.060

Waiver of course of study in Washington's history and government.

Students in the twelfth grade who have not completed a course of study in Washington's history and state government because of previous residence outside the state may have the requirement in RCW 28A.230.090 waived by their principal.

[ 1991 c 116 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 57 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.05.050. Prior: 1967 c 64 s 1, part; 1963 c 31 s 1, part; 1961 c 47 s 2, part; 1941 c 203 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4898-3, part. Formerly RCW 28A.05.050, 28.05.050.]